New York, session 2025-2026, S3528.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 186-f of the tax 2 law, as added by section 3 of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2009, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) forty-one and seven-tenths of the revenues collected and received 5 under this section into the [state general fund] New York state local 6 emergency services account established pursuant to section ninety-nine- 7 ss of the state finance law; and 8 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-ss to 9 read as follows: 10 § 99-ss. New York state local emergency services account. 1. There is 11 hereby established in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the 12 commissioner of the department of taxation and finance a special fund to 13 be known as the New York state local emergency services account. Moneys 14 in this account shall be kept separate and not commingled with any other 15 moneys in the custody of the comptroller. 16 2. The sum equal to the amount identified in paragraph (a) of subdivi- 17 sion five of section one hundred eighty-six-f of the tax law shall be 18 credited to the fund. 19 3. (a) Monies collected and deposited into the New York state local 20 emergency services account shall be used to: reimburse county and other 21 municipal fire, police and emergency medical services departments, 22 volunteer fire companies, volunteer fire departments, volunteer fire 23 districts, volunteer fire protection districts and not-for-profit emer- 24 gency medical services for expenses incurred related to procurement of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03997-01-5 S. 3528 2 1 any equipment including radio and communication items, apparatus, vehi- 2 cles including snowmobiles, all terrain vehicles, and boats, goods or 3 services related to the renovation of any buildings, and personal 4 protective equipment including but not be limited to, face shields, eye 5 protection, isolation gowns, face masks, respirators, and turnout gear. 6 (b) Such reimbursements shall only be made upon application by a coun- 7 ty or other municipal fire, police or emergency medical services depart- 8 ment volunteer fire company, department, district, or non-profit EMS 9 service to the New York state division of homeland security. The divi- 10 sion of homeland security may require submission of documentation with 11 an application for reimbursement as it deems necessary. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.